es: Tipo de balón de fútbol americano: Autógrafo/coleccionable; Playa/agua; Personalizado; Juego; Práctica; Recreativo; Souvenir; Tailgate; Entrenamiento; Con peso; Otro
zh-CN: 足球用球类型: 签名/收藏; 沙滩/水上; 定制/个性化; 比赛; 练习; 休闲; 纪念品; 汽车尾门派对; 训练; 加重; 其他
en: Football ball type: Autograph/Collectible; Beach/Water; Customized/Personalized; Game; Practice; Recreational; Souvenir; Tailgate; Training; Weighted; Other
fr: Type de ballon de football: Autographe/collection; Plage/eau; Sur mesure/personnalisé; Match; Pratique; Loisir; Souvenir; Avant-match; Entraînement; Lesté; Autre
ja: サッカーボールタイプ: サイン用/コレクター向け; ビーチ/水上用; カスタマイズ/パーソナライズ; 試合用; 練習用; レクリエーション用; お土産用; テールゲート; トレーニング; 加重; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de bola de futebol americano: Autógrafo/colecionável; Praia/água; Personalizada; Jogo; Prática; Recreativa; Souvenir; Tailgate; Treino; Com peso; Outra
ru: Тип футбольного мяча: С автографом / коллекционный; Пляжный / водный; На заказ / именной; Игровой; Для практики; Любительский; Сувенирный; Для пикника (тейлгейт); Тренировочный; Утяжеленный; Другое
de: Art des Footballs: Autogramm/Sammlerstück; Strand/Wasser; Maßgefertigt/Personalisiert; Spiel; Übung; Freizeit; Souvenir; Tailgate; Training; Beschwert; Sonstiges
tr: Futbol topu türü: İmzalı/koleksiyonluk; Plaj/su; Özelleştirilmiş/kişiselleştirilmiş; Maç; Pratik; Eğlence; Hatıra; Tailgate; Antrenman; Ağırlıklı; Diğer
fi: Footbag-pallon tyyppi: Nimikirjoitus/keräily; Ranta/vesi; Mukautettu/yksilöity; Peli; Harjoitus; Harraste; Matkamuisto; Tailgate; Treeni; Painotettu; Muu
vi: Loại bóng đá: Có chữ ký/Đồ sưu tầm; Bãi biển/Dưới nước; Tùy chỉnh/Cá nhân hóa; Thi đấu; Luyện tập; Giải trí; Lưu niệm; Tailgate; Tập luyện; Có trọng lượng; Khác
ko: 축구공 유형: 사인/소장용; 해변/수중용; 맞춤형/주문 제작; 경기용; 연습용; 레크리에이션용; 기념품; 테일게이트용; 트레이닝용; 웨이티드(중량형); 기타
it: tipo pallone da calcio: Da autografo/da collezione; Da spiaggia/da acqua; Personalizzato; Da partita; Da allenamento; Amatoriale; Souvenir; Da tailgate; Da training; Appesantito; Altro
pl: Typ piłki futbolowej: Na autografy / Kolekcjonerska; Plażowa / Do wody; Niestandardowa / Personalizowana; Meczowa; Do ćwiczeń; Rekreacyjna; Pamiątkowa; Rekreacyjna (Tailgate); Treningowa; Z obciążeniem; Inna
sv: Typ av fotbollsboll: Autograf/samlarobjekt; Strand/vatten; Anpassad/personlig; Match; Träning; Fritid; Souvenir; Tailgate; Träning; Viktad; Övrigt
cs: Typ fotbalového míče: Pro autogramy / sběratelský; Na pláž / do vody; Na míru / personalizovaný; Zápasový; Cvičný; Rekreační; Suvenýr; Tailgate; Tréninkový; Zátěžový; Jiný
pt-PT: tipo de bola de futebol: Autógrafos/colecionável; Praia/água; Personalizada; Jogo; Prática; Lazer; Lembrança; Pré-jogo (tailgate); Treino; Com pesos; Outro
sk-SK: Typ futbalovej lopty: S autogramom/zberateľská; Plážová/do vody; Prispôsobená/personalizovaná; Zápasová; Cvičná; Rekreačná; Suvenír; Tailgate (predzápasová); Tréningová; Záťažová; Iné
el: Τύπος μπάλας ποδοσφαίρου: Αυτόγραφο/Συλλεκτικό; Παραλία/Νερό; Προσαρμοσμένο/Εξατομικευμένο; Αγώνα; Εξάσκησης; Ψυχαγωγίας; Αναμνηστικό; Tailgate; Προπόνησης; Με επιπλέον βάρος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип футболна топка: С автограф/Колекционерска; Плажна/За вода; Персонализирана; За мач; За практика; За развлечение; Сувенирна; За тейлгейт (Tailgate); Тренировъчна; С тежест; Друга
ro-RO: Tipul de minge de fotbal: Autograf/De colecție; Plajă/Apă; Personalizat; Joc; Antrenament; Recreațional; Suvenir; Tailgate; Antrenament; Lestat; Altele
lt-LT: Futbolo kamuolio tipas: Autografams / kolekcinis; Paplūdimio / vandens; Pritaikytas / personalizuotas; Rungtynių; Treniruočių; Laisvalaikio; Suvenyrinis; Bagažinės vakarėliams („Tailgate“); Mokomasis; Pasunkintas; Kita
nb: Type fotballball: Autograf/samleobjekt; Strand/vann; Tilpasset/personlig; Kamp; Øving; Fritid; Suvenir; Tailgate; Trening; Vektet; Annet
zh-TW: 美式足球球類型: 簽名/收藏; 海灘/水上; 客製化/個人化; 比賽用; 練習用; 休閒用; 紀念品; 尾門派對用; 訓練用; 加重; 其他
nl: American footballbal type: Handtekening/verzamelobject; Strand/water; Op maat gemaakt/gepersonaliseerd; Wedstrijd; Oefening; Recreatief; Souvenir; Tailgate; Training; Verzwaard; Overige
hu: Futball labda típusa: Aláírásra / Gyűjtői; Strand / Víz; Egyedi / Személyre szabott; Mérkőzés; Gyakorló; Szabadidős; Szuvenír; Szurkolói; Edző; Súlyozott; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta nogometne žoge: Za avtogram/zbirateljstvo; Za plažo/vodo; Po meri/personalizirano; Tekma; Vadba; Rekreacijsko; Spominek; Tailgate; Trening; Obteženo; Drugo
da: Type af fodbold: Autograf/samleobjekt; Strand/vand; Tilpasset/personliggjort; Kamp; Øvelse; Fritid; Souvenir; Tailgate; Træning; Med vægt; Andet
th: ประเภทลูกฟุตบอล: ลายเซ็น/ของสะสม; ชายหาด/น้ำ; ปรับแต่ง/เป็นส่วนตัว; สำหรับแข่งขัน; สำหรับฝึกซ้อม; สันทนาการ; ของที่ระลึก; กิจกรรมปาร์ตี้ท้ายรถ; สำหรับเทรนนิง; ถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta nogometne lopte: Za autograme / kolekcionarski; Za plažu / vodu; Prilagođeni / personalizirani; Za utakmicu; Za vježbu; Rekreativni; Suvenir; Za zabave prije utakmice; Za trening; S utezima; Ostalo